Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
MEMBERSHIP PARTICIPATION

31-31.5-201. Membership.

Except as otherwise provided in this article 31.5 or article 31 of this title 31, a member whose employer is affiliated with a component of the statewide retirement plan shall participate in the statewide retirement plan on the first day of employment if the employer withholds member contributions on behalf of the member and the applicable forms are completed and submitted to the association.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 283, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-202. Reentering and affiliating employers.

Members of employers who reenter or affiliate pursuant to part 7 or part 11 of article 31 of this title 31 shall participate in the statewide retirement plan beginning on the employer's effective date pursuant to rules adopted by the board.

Members covered by subsection (1) of this section may elect a trustee-to-trustee transfer in order to transfer assets from the predecessor money purchase plan to the member's individual account established pursuant to part 5 of this article 31.5.

An active member who is required to transfer money purchase assets to the statewide retirement plan may also elect to convert the vested proceeds from the predecessor money purchase plan into service credit towards the accrual of benefits under the lifetime benefit components as may be allowed pursuant to the board's rules.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 283, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-203. Department chief - exemption by written agreement - definition.

A department chief hired on or after April 8, 1978, is exempt from the statewide retirement plan upon the execution of a written agreement between the department chief and the chief's employer that provides for the department chief's participation in social security or in a federal insurance contribution act replacement plan as allowed under rules established by the board and in compliance with the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986". A department chief may satisfy the federal insurance contribution act replacement plan requirement by participating in an employer sponsored plan, the statewide money purchase plan, or a component of the statewide retirement plan.

As used in this section, "department chief" means the senior command officer of any fire or police department of any employer by whatever title known including but not limited to chief, administrator, or director.

A department chief exempted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may maintain coverage for disability and survivor benefits under part 8 of this article if the department chief participates in the statewide money purchase plan, the statewide retirement plan, or a local money purchase plan that is qualified under section 401(a) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" and that has a contribution rate of not less than eighteen percent.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 284, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-204. Reemployment.

An inactive member who is subsequently reemployed shall participate in the plan in the manner prescribed by rules adopted by the board.

The board shall adopt rules regarding the treatment of a member who participates in the statewide retirement plan, incurs a bona fide separation from service, elects a retirement, and subsequently returns to work with an employer who participates in the statewide retirement plan in conformance with the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Such rules must indicate:

Whether the member continues to receive benefit distributions during the reemployment or whether the member's benefit distribution ceases during reemployment;

Whether the member earns additional service credit as determined by the plan in which the subsequent employer participates or whether the member earns additional retirement benefits by participating in an alternate money purchase plan; and

Whether the benefit distribution, if ceased during reemployment, resumes when the member subsequently separates from service.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 284, § 1, effective August 10.